Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-604
Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be used solely for the purposes of administering and enforcing the laws specified in section 8-601.

(2) Any money in the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2007, LB124, § 11;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 121;

Laws 2026, LB836, § 4.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.